Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 3 Community Service

Editor’s notes.

This article is the same as or substantially similar to former Article 4 of Chapter 8 of Title 42.

42-3-50.
Definitions; assignment of community service for personal gain prohibited.

As used in this article, the term:

“Agency” means any private or public entity or organization that provides services to the public and enhances the social welfare and general well-being of the community. Such term may include educational institutions and religious organizations that are nonprofit corporations or are qualified as tax exempt under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c)(3), as it existed on March 1, 2018.

“Community service” means uncompensated work by an offender with an agency pursuant to an order by a court as a condition of probation or in lieu of payment of financial obligations imposed by a court.

“Community service officer” means an individual appointed by the court to place and supervise offenders sentenced to community service or educational advancement. Such term includes a paid professional or a volunteer.

“Educational advancement” means attending a work or job skills training program, a preparatory class for a state approved high school equivalency (HSE) diploma, or similar activity.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, it shall be unlawful for an agency or community service officer to use or allow an offender to be used for any purpose resulting in private gain to any individual.

Subsection (b) of this Code section shall not apply to:

Work on private property because of a natural disaster; or

An order or direction by the court.

Any person who violates subsection (b) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 2-11/SB 407; Ga. L. 2022, p. 168, § 8/SB 397.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (a)(1) for the former provisions, which read: “‘Agency’ means any private or public agency or organization approved by the court to participate in a community service program.”; substituted the present provisions of paragraph (a)(2) for the former provisions, which read: “‘Community service’ means uncompensated work by an offender with an agency for the benefit of the community pursuant to an order by a court as a condition of probation. Such term includes uncompensated service by an offender who lives in the household of a disabled person and provides aid and services to such disabled person, including, but not limited to, cooking, housecleaning, shopping, driving, bathing, and dressing.”; in paragraph (a)(3), added “or educational advancement” at the end of the first sentence, substituted “includes” for “may mean” in the second sentence; added paragraph (a)(4); deleted former paragraph (c)(1), which read: “Services provided by an offender to a disabled person in accordance with paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of Code Section 42-3-52;”; redesignated former paragraphs (c)(2) and (c)(3) as present paragraphs (c)(1) and (c)(2), respectively; and deleted “sentencing” preceding “court” in paragraph (c)(2).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “a state approved high school equivalency (HSE)” for “the general educational development (GED)” in paragraph (a)(4).

Editor’s notes.

This Code section is the same as or substantially similar to former Code Section 42-8-70.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).

For annual survey on criminal law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 63 (2018).

42-3-51.
Community service or educational advancement program; letter of application; requirements; limitation of liability.

Agencies desiring to allow offenders to participate in their program shall file with the court a letter of application showing:

Eligibility;

Number of offenders who may be placed with the agency;

Work to be performed by the offender; and

Provisions for supervising the offender.

An agency selected by the court shall work with offenders who are assigned to the agency by the court. If an offender violates a court order, the agency shall report such violation to the community service officer.

If an agency violates any court order or this article, the offender shall be removed from the agency and the agency shall no longer be eligible to participate in the court’s community service or in an educational advancement program.

No agency or community service officer shall be liable at law as a result of any of such agency’s or community service officer’s acts performed while an offender was participating in the court’s community service or in an educational advancement program. This limitation of liability shall not apply to actions on the part of any agency or community service officer which constitute gross negligence, recklessness, or willful misconduct.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 2-11/SB 407; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 42/SB 52; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 42/SB 429.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “allow offenders to participate in their program” for “participate in a community service program” in subsection (a); substituted “by the court” for “for the community service program” in the first sentence of subsection (b); inserted “or educational advancement” near the end of subsection (c) and near the end of the first sentence of subsection (d); in subsection (c), deleted “provision of” preceding “this article” near the middle, inserted “court’s” in the middle; and inserted “an offender was” in the middle of the first sentence of subsection (d).

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, inserted “with” in the first sentence of subsection (b); and inserted “in an” near the end of the first sentence of subsection (d).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, inserted “in an” near the end of subsection (c); and substituted “in the court’s community service” for “in community service” in the first sentence of subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

This Code section is the same or substantially similar to former Code Section 42-8-71.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).

42-3-52.
Community service or educational advancement as condition of probation.

Community service or educational advancement may be considered as a condition of probation or in lieu of court imposed financial obligations with primary consideration given to the following categories of offenders:

Traffic violations;

Ordinance violations;

Noninjurious or nondestructive, nonviolent misdemeanors;

Noninjurious or nondestructive, nonviolent felonies; and

Other offenders considered upon the discretion of the court.

The court may confer with the prosecuting attorney, the offender or his or her attorney if the offender is represented by an attorney, a community supervision officer, a community service officer, or other interested persons to determine if community service or educational advancement is appropriate for an offender. A court order shall specify that the court has approved community service or educational assistance for an offender. If community service or educational advancement is ordered, the court shall order:

Not less than 20 hours nor more than 250 hours in cases involving traffic or ordinance violations or misdemeanors, such service to be completed within one year; or

Not less than 20 hours nor more than 500 hours in felony cases, such service to be completed within three years.

The court may order an offender to perform community service hours in a 40 hour per week work detail in lieu of incarceration.

Community service or educational advancement hours may be added to original court ordered hours as a disciplinary action by the court, as an additional requirement of any program in lieu of incarceration, or as part of the sentencing options system as set forth in Article 6 of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-52

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 2-11/SB 407.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in the introductory paragraph of subsection (a), inserted “or educational advancement” and “or in lieu of court imposed financial obligations”; in subsection (b), substituted “if community service or educational advancement” for “if the community service program” near the end of the first sentence, added the second sentence, and substituted “or educational advancement is ordered,” for “is ordered as a condition of probation,” in the third sentence; deleted former subsection (c), which read: “(1) Any agency may recommend to the court that certain disabled persons are in need of a live-in attendant. The court shall confer with the prosecuting attorney, the offender or his or her attorney if the offender is represented by an attorney, a community supervision officer, a community service officer, or other interested persons to determine if a community service program involving a disabled person is appropriate for an offender. If community service as a live-in attendant for a disabled person is deemed appropriate and if both the offender and the disabled person consent to such service, the court may order such live-in community service as a condition of probation but for no longer than two years.

“(2) The agency shall be responsible for coordinating the provisions of the cost of food or other necessities for the offender which the disabled person is not able to provide. The agency, with the approval of the court, shall determine a schedule which will provide the offender with certain free hours each week.

“(3) Such live-in arrangement shall be terminated by the court upon the request of the offender or the disabled person. Upon termination of such arrangement, the court shall determine if the offender has met the conditions of probation.

“(4) The appropriate agency shall make personal contact with the disabled person on a frequent basis to ensure the safety and welfare of the disabled person.”; redesignated former subsections (d) and (e) as present subsections (c) and (d), respectively; and inserted “or educational advancement” near the beginning of subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

This Code section is the same as or substantially similar to former Code Section 42-8-72.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).

For annual survey on criminal law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 63 (2018).

42-3-53.
Placement with appropriate agency; approval by court; report of offender’s performance.

The community service officer shall place an offender sentenced to community service or educational advancement with an appropriate agency. The agency and work schedule shall be approved by the court. If the offender is employed at the time of sentencing or if the offender becomes employed after sentencing, the community service officer shall consider the offender’s work schedule and, to the extent practicable, shall schedule the community service or educational advancement so that it will not conflict with the offender’s work schedule. This scheduling accommodation shall not be construed as requiring the community service officer to alter scheduled community service or educational advancement based on changes in an offender’s work schedule. The community service officer shall supervise the offender for the duration of the sentence which requires community service or educational advancement. Upon completion of the such sentence, the community service officer shall prepare a written report evaluating the offender’s performance which shall be used to determine if the conditions of probation or sentence have been satisfied.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-53

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 2-11/SB 407.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “or educational advancement” for “as a condition of probation” in the first sentence, inserted “or educational advancement” in the third and fourth sentences, inserted “scheduling accommodation” near the beginning of the fourth sentence, substituted “sentence which requires community service or educational advancement” for “community service sentence” in the next-to-last sentence, and, in the last sentence, substituted “such” for “community service” near the middle, and inserted “or sentence” near the end.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section is the same as or substantially similar to former Code Section 42-8-73.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).

42-3-54.
Applicability of Articles 2, 3, and 6 of this chapter.

Article 2 of Chapter 8 of this title shall be applicable to offenders sentenced to community service or educational advancement pursuant to this article. Article 3 of Chapter 8 of this title shall be applicable to first offenders sentenced to community service or educational advancement pursuant to this article. Article 6 of Chapter 8 of this title shall be applicable to misdemeanor or ordinance violator offenders sentenced to community service or educational advancement pursuant to this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-54

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 2-11/SB 407.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “(a) The provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 8 of this title shall be applicable to offenders sentenced to community service as a condition of probation pursuant to this article. The provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 8 of this title shall be applicable to first offenders sentenced pursuant to this article. The provisions of Article 6 of Chapter 8 of this title shall be applicable to misdemeanor or ordinance violator offenders sentenced to community service as a condition of probation pursuant to this article.

“(b) Any offender who provides live-in community service but who is later incarcerated for breaking the conditions of probation or for any other cause may be awarded good time for each day of live-in community service the same as if such offender were in prison for such number of days.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).